District of Columbia statutes.
29-806.03

Effect of person’s dissociation as member.

(a)

When a person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company:

(1)

The person’s right to participate as a member in the management and conduct of the company’s activities and affairs shall terminate;

(2)

If the company is member-managed, the person’s duties and obligations under § 29-804.09 end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person’s dissociation; and

(3)

Subject to § 29-805.04, subchapter IX of this chapter, and Chapter 2 of this title, any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person’s capacity as a member is owned by the person solely as a transferee.

(b)

A person’s dissociation as a member of a limited liability company shall not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the company or the other members which the person incurred while a member.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(7)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 603 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” in (a)(1); and substituted “duties and obligations under § 29-804.09” for “fiduciary duties as a member shall” in (a)(2).